Hawaii statutes.
PART 5.
SECURITY ENTITLEMENTS

§490:8-501 Securities account; acquisition
of security entitlement from securities intermediary. (a)
"Securities account" means an account to which a financial asset is
or may be credited in accordance with an agreement under which the person
maintaining the account undertakes to treat the person for whom the account is
maintained as entitled to exercise the rights that comprise the financial
asset.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in
subsections (d) and (e), a person acquires a security entitlement if a
securities intermediary:

(1) Indicates by book entry that a financial asset
has been credited to the person's securities account;

(2) Receives a financial asset from the person or
acquires a financial asset for the person and, in either case, accepts it for
credit to the person's securities account; or

(3) Becomes obligated under other law, regulation, or
rule to credit a financial asset to the person's securities account.

(c) If a condition of subsection (b) has been
met, a person has a security entitlement even though the securities
intermediary does not itself hold the financial asset.

(d) If a securities intermediary holds a
financial asset for another person, and the financial asset is registered in
the name of, payable to the order of, or specially indorsed to the other
person, and has not been indorsed to the securities intermediary or in blank,
the other person is treated as holding the financial asset directly rather than
as having a security entitlement with respect to the financial asset.

(e) Issuance of a security is not
establishment of a security entitlement. [L 1997, c 33, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next